Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.780

Liability of fire service protection agency in providing firefighting efforts outside of jurisdiction or emergency services.

Any fire service protection agency, as well as the firefighters therein, whether volunteer or paid, which takes part in firefighting efforts outside its jurisdiction or provides emergency care, rescue, assistance, or recovery services at the scene of an emergency, is not liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of such services, other than acts or omissions constituting gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.

[ 2011 c 200 s 2.]